Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1207
State or
local agency head; duties.

In accordance with
general law and
with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the administrator
and the board as provided in section 84-1216, the head
of any state or local agency shall:

(1) Establish and maintain an active, continuing program for the efficient, cost-effective, modern, and
economical management of the record-keeping activities of the agency;

(2) Make and maintain records containing adequate and proper documentation
of the organization, functions, policies, decisions, procedures, and essential
transactions of the agency, designed to furnish information to protect the
legal and financial rights of the state, and of persons directly affected
by the agency's activities;

(3) Make and
submit to the administrator schedules
proposing the length of time each record series warrants retention for administrative,
legal, historical, or
fiscal purposes, after it has been made in or received by the agency, and
lists of records in the custody or under the control of the agency which are
not needed in the transaction of current business and do not possess sufficient administrative,
legal, historical, or
fiscal value to warrant their further retention;

(4) Inventory the records in the custody or under the control of the
agency and submit
to the administrator a report thereon, containing such data as the administrator
shall prescribe, including
his or her recommendations
as to which of such records, if any, should be determined
to be essential records. He or
she shall review the inventory and report periodically
and, as necessary, shall revise the report so that it is current,
accurate, and complete;

(5) Comply with the rules, regulations, standards, and procedures issued and set up by the administrator
and the board and
cooperate in the conduct of surveys made by the administrator pursuant to the Records Management Act; and

(6) Strive to reduce
the costs to manage record retention.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 7, p. 1389;

Laws 1969, c. 841, § 5, p. 3171;

Laws 1979, LB 559, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 16;

Laws 2012, LB880, § 7.